Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2101
Act, how cited.

Sections 21-2101 to 21-2117 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Business Development Corporation Act.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 1, p. 302.